Utah statutes.
31A-5-401.1.   Definitions.

As used in this Part 4:

(1)  "Voting members of mutuals" and "voting members" mean persons entitled to vote at annual or special meetings of the members of a mutual, as set forth in the articles of incorporation or amendments to the articles.

(2)  Voting members of mutuals and voting members do not necessarily include policyholders of the mutual, if the articles of incorporation or amendments to the articles of incorporation so provide, and if the articles of incorporation or amendments have been approved by the commissioner after a hearing.

